Louisiana, session 2026, HB251.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:1844(K)(4) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1844. Basic rights for victim and witness
* * *
K.
* * *
(4) No trial court shall grant a motion that would effectuate vacating an
otherwise final conviction or resentencing an imprisoned person to a lesser sentence
without a hearing where the victim shall have the right to make a statement pursuant
to this Subsection. The clerk of court shall provide written notice of the pending
motion and its impact to the victim pursuant to R.S. 46:1844(B). Any motion
granted without compliance with this Paragraph shall be voidable as a patent error
pursuant to Code of Criminal Procedure Article 920(2). Any motion granted that is
subject to the provisions of this Paragraph and pending appellate review may, sua
sponte, be remanded for consideration of the victim's statement. When the victim
is deceased or unable to appear due to disability, every reference in this Paragraph
to the victim shall instead apply to the victim's designated family member as defined
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 251 ENROLLED
in R.S. 46:1842(5). This Section does not create or permit individual standing to
intervene in a criminal proceeding at any time.
* * *
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall be given prospective application.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.